District of Columbia statutes.
16-547

Retention of property or credits by garnishee.

Where the property or credits attached or sought to be attached are held by the garnishee in the name of or for the account of a person other than the defendant, the garnishee shall retain the property or credits during the period pending determination by the court of the propriety of the attachment or the rightful owner of the property or credits. During that period the garnishee shall incur no liability whatsoever for the retention.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 552, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-547.
1973 Ed., § 16-547.